Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.110

Justices, judges to wear gowns.

Each of the justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, and the judges of the superior courts shall in open court during the presentation of causes, before them, appear in and wear gowns, made of black silk, of the usual style of judicial gowns.

[ 1971 c 81 s 4; 1909 c 206 s 1; RRS s 11054. Formerly RCW 2.04.110, 2.08.130.]